vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((dex)dar, ((dex)?asue|des|kon(tra)?|[lƚ]iku[ei]|putre|(ra)?re|sastu|sat[iu]s|sodis|sora|stra|stupe|tore|tume)far, (kon(tra)?|mal|move|o|re|so(ra|to))star)
# themeT1 + r/a3a4a5P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/a3a4a5P0P1P2FSI0
# themeT8 + oe/a3a4a5P0P1P2FSI0
# themeT6 + do/M0Y0
# themeT6 + da/F0Y0
SFX a4 Y 104
SFX a4 ào age-lo/A1 ào
SFX a4 0 àlo/A1 ar
SFX a4 0 à-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 0 àe-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 0 àvelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 0 emo/P1 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a4 0 íelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 0 íe-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 0 íselo/I8 ar
SFX a4 0 on/P1 ar
SFX a4 0 onme/P7 ar
SFX a4 0 ónmelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 0 ave-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 0 ion/P1 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a4 0 ionme/P7 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a4 0 iónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a4 0 lo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar élo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar ent ar
SFX a4 ar eràlo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar erave-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar erà-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar eràe-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar eràelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar eràvelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar erémolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar erémomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar eríe-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar eríelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar eríselo/I8 ar
SFX a4 ar es ar
SFX a4 ar est ar
SFX a4 ar eve-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar ionme/P7 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a4 ar iónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a4 ar onme/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar à/P1 ar
SFX a4 ar àmelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar àndolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar àndomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar àntolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar àntomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar àrmelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar àvelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar è-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar èlo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar èlo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar èmelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar é-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar ée-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar éelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar emo/P1 ar
SFX a4 ar émolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar émomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar endo/P1 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a4 ar éndolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar éndomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar ento/P0P1FS ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a4 ar ènto/P0P1FS ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a4 ar éntolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar éntomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar eremo/P1 ar
SFX a4 ar évelo/A1 ar
SFX a4 ar on/P1 ar
SFX a4 ar ónmelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 ar ion/P1 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a4 e lo/P7 oe
SFX a4 e melo/P7 oe
SFX a4 e nt oe
SFX a4 o a/P1 o
SFX a4 o e/P1 o
SFX a4 o i/P1 o
SFX a4 o lo/A1 ào
SFX a4 o -lo/A1 ào
SFX a4 o elo/A1 o
SFX a4 o e-lo/A1 o
SFX a4 o gelo/A1 ào
SFX a4 oe alo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe amelo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe elo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe emelo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe galo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe gamelo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe gilo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe gimelo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe ilo/P7 oe
SFX a4 oe imelo/P7 oe
SFX a4 r gando/P1 ar
SFX a4 r gàndolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 r gàndomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 r gàntolo/P7 ar
SFX a4 r gàntomelo/P7 ar
SFX a4 r lo/P7 ar
SFX a4 r ndo/P1 ar
SFX a4 r nto/P1 ar
SFX a4 r t ar
SFX a4 r ve-lo/A1 ar
SFX a4 r nt ar
SFX a4 r s ar
SFX a4 r st ar
SFX a4 ào ak ào
SFX a4 ào aga/P1 ào
SFX a4 ào agi/P1 ào
SFX a4 ào ago/P1 ào

# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((dex)dar, ((dex)?asue|des|kon(tra)?|[lƚ]iku[ei]|putre|(ra)?re|sastu|sat[iu]s|sodis|sora|stra|stupe|tore|tume)far, (kon(tra)?|mal|move|o|re|so(ra|to))star)
# themeT1 + r/a3a4a5P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/a3a4a5P0P1P2FSI0
# themeT8 + oe/a3a4a5P0P1P2FSI0
# themeT6 + do/M0Y0
# themeT6 + da/F0Y0
SFX a5 Y 90
SFX a5 ào age-ƚo/A1 ào
SFX a5 0 àƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 0 à-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 0 àe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 0 àveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 0 emo/P2 ar	ts:indicative_future
SFX a5 0 íeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 0 íe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 0 íseƚo/I9 ar
SFX a5 0 on/P2 ar
SFX a5 0 ónmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 0 ave-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 0 ion/P2 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a5 0 iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a5 ar à/P2 ar
SFX a5 ar àmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar àndoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar àndomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar àntoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar àntomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar àrmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar àveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar èƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar èƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar è-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar èmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar éƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar é-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar éeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar ée-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar emo/P2 ar
SFX a5 ar émoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar émomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar endo/P2 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a5 ar éndoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar éndomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar ento/P0P2 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a5 ar ènto/P0P2 ar	ts:gerund_simple
SFX a5 ar éntoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar éntomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar éveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar ónmeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar eràƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar erà-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar eràeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar eràe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar eràveƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar eremo/P2 ar
SFX a5 ar erémoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar erémomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 ar eríeƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar eríe-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar eríseƚo/I9 ar
SFX a5 ar erave-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar eve-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ar ion/P2 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a5 ar iónmeƚo/P8 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a5 ar on/P2 ar
SFX a5 e ƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 e meƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 o a/P2 o
SFX a5 o e/P2 o
SFX a5 o i/P2 o
SFX a5 o ƚo/A1 ào
SFX a5 o -ƚo/A1 ào
SFX a5 o eƚo/A1 o
SFX a5 o e-ƚo/A1 o
SFX a5 o geƚo/A1 ào
SFX a5 oe aƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe ameƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe eƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe emeƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe gaƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe gameƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe giƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe gimeƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe iƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 oe imeƚo/P8 oe
SFX a5 r ƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 r gando/P2 ar
SFX a5 r gàndoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 r gàndomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 r gàntoƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 r gàntomeƚo/P8 ar
SFX a5 r ndo/P2 ar
SFX a5 r nto/P2 ar
SFX a5 r ve-ƚo/A1 ar
SFX a5 ào aga/P2 ào
SFX a5 ào agi/P2 ào
SFX a5 ào ago/P2 ào

# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((re)andar)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2a6P0P1P2
SFX a6 Y 37
SFX a6 andar vàtu/I3 andar	is:interrogative
SFX a6 andar vede/I4 andar
SFX a6 andar vege/I4 andar
SFX a6 andar vemo/P0P1P2I0 andar
SFX a6 andar ven/I0 andar
SFX a6 andar vene andar
SFX a6 andar vétu/I3 andar	is:interrogative
SFX a6 andar véu/I5 andar
SFX a6 andar vion/P0P1P2I0 andar
SFX a6 andar vione/I1 andar	is:interrogative
SFX a6 andar vionme/P6P7 andar
SFX a6 andar viónmene/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 andar von/P0P1P2I0 andar
SFX a6 andar vone/I1 andar	is:interrogative
SFX a6 andar vonme/P6P7 andar
SFX a6 andar và/P0P1P2 andar
SFX a6 andar vàme/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 andar vàmene/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 andar vè/P3P4P5I0I4 andar
SFX a6 andar vème/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 andar vèmene/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 andar vètu/I3 andar	is:interrogative
SFX a6 andar vèu/I5 andar
SFX a6 andar vé/P3P4P5I4 andar
SFX a6 andar vónmene/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 o a vào
SFX a6 o e/P3P4P5I0 vào
SFX a6 o gone/I1 vào	is:interrogative
SFX a6 o i vào
SFX a6 r gando/P0P1P2 andar
SFX a6 r gàndome/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 r gàndomene/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 r gàntome/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 r gàntomene/P6P7P8 andar
SFX a6 ào aga vào
SFX a6 ào agi/P3P4P5I2 vào
SFX a6 ào ago/I0M0 vào
