vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
andar/a0a1a2a6P0P1P2.0r0r5V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vào/a3a4a5I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:andar
revào/a3a4a5I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:reandar
dar/a3a4a5P0P1P2-1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
dào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0-1	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:dar
dàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0-1	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:dar
far/a3a4a5P0P1P2.0:0^4^7r2r3	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
fào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2.0:0^4^7	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:far
fàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0.0:0^4^7	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:far
likuefar/a3a4P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
likuefào/a3a4P0P1I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:likuefar
likuefàoe/a3a4P0P1I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:likuefar
ƚikuefar/a3a5P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ƚikuefào/a3a5P0P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ƚikuefar
ƚikuefàoe/a3a5P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:ƚikuefar
likuifar/a3a4P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
likuifào/a3a4P0P1I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:likuifar
likuifàoe/a3a4P0P1I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:likuifar
ƚikuifar/a3a5P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ƚikuifào/a3a5P0P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:ƚikuifar
ƚikuifàoe/a3a5P0P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:ƚikuifar
putrefar/a3a4a5P0P1P2r2r3	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
putrefào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:putrefar
putrefàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:putrefar
sorafar/a3a4a5P0P1P2r2r3	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sorafào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sorafar
sorafàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:sorafar
strafar/a3a4a5P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
strafào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:strafar
strafàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:strafar
stopefar/a3a4a5P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
stopefào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:stopefar
stopefàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:stopefar
stupefar/a3a4a5P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
stupefào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:stupefar
stupefàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:stupefar
torefar/a3a4a5P0P1P2r2r3	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
torefào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:torefar
torefàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:torefar
tumefar/a3a4a5P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
tumefào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0I2	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:tumefar
tumefàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:tumefar
star/a3a4a5P0P1P2^7	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
stào/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0^7	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:star
stàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0^7	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:star
movestar/a3a4a5P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
movestao/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:movestar
movestàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:movestar
sotostar/a3a4a5P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sotostao/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:sotostar
sotostàoe/a3a4a5P0P1P2I0	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:sotostar
